Nebraska, session 109, LB62.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB62 LB62
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) There is hereby appropriated $19,000,000 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 to the Department of Administrative Services,
for Program 245, for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) The Department of Administrative Services shall provide the
funds appropriated in this section to the office of the Chief Information
Officer for the following purposes:
(a) Establishing interoperable communications between state agencies
and volunteer departments by providing portable and mobile radios,
programming, and installation of all radios and equipment; and
(b) Training for interoperability with the Statewide Radio System to
connect volunteer departments and agencies to the Statewide Radio System
through a grant program. Eligibility for such program shall be based on
the number and type of radios required for each volunteer department
based upon such department's needs and size. The office of the Chief
Information Officer shall not charge any subscription, programming, or
training fee for any volunteer department connected to the Statewide
Radio System after receiving a grant from the program. It is the intent
of the Legislature that all grant funds be distributed by June 30, 2028.
(3) For purposes of this section, volunteer department has the same
meaning as in section 35-901.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-